California statutes. Public Resources Code
All moneys that are received by the state pursuant to the federal Clarke-McNary Act and that are regularly allotted by the federal government according to an annual formula shall be paid into the General Fund. Any supplemental money received from the federal government pursuant to the federal Clarke-McNary Act for use by the department for specially designated projects shall be authorized by the Director of Finance for augmentation of the subitem captioned “Reimbursements” of the principal item of appropriation from the General Fund for the support of the department contained in the Budget Act for the fiscal year during which the supplemental money is received. However, the Director of Finance shall not authorize the augmentation sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity for the
 augmentation to the chairperson of the committee in each house that considers appropriations and to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or sooner than whatever lesser time which the chairperson of that committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 255.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4187.

A county which enacts an ordinance, as provided in Section 4129, is entitled to any allocation of moneys received by the state pursuant to the Clarke-McNary Act. Such reimbursement may be provided for by any statute of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Fire Hazard Severity Zones [4201. - 4204.]

4201.

The purpose of this article is to provide for the classification of lands within state responsibility areas in accordance with the severity of fire hazard present for the purpose of identifying measures to be taken to retard the rate of spreading and to reduce the potential intensity of uncontrolled fires that threaten to destroy resources, life, or property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 806, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4202.

The State Fire Marshal shall classify lands within state responsibility areas into fire hazard severity zones. Each zone shall embrace relatively homogeneous lands and shall be based on fuel loading, slope, fire weather, and other relevant factors present, including areas where winds have been identified by the department as a major cause of wildfire spread.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 225, Sec. 13.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4203.

(a) The State Fire Marshal shall, by regulation, designate fire hazard severity zones and assign to each zone a rating reflecting the degree of severity of fire hazard that is expected to prevail in the zone.

(b) No designation of a zone and assignment of a rating shall be adopted by the State Fire Marshal until the proposed regulation has been transmitted to the board of supervisors of the county in which the zone is located at least 45 days before the adoption of the proposed regulation and a public hearing has been held in that county during that 45-day period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 225, Sec. 14.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4204.

The State Fire Marshal shall periodically review zones designated and rated pursuant to this article and, as necessary, shall revise zones or their ratings or repeal the designation of zones. Any revision of a zone or its rating or any repeal of a zone shall conform to the requirements of Section 4203. In addition, the revision or repeal of a zone may be petitioned pursuant to Sections 11340.6 and 11340.7 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 225, Sec. 15.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Commission on Catastrophic Wildfire Cost and Recovery [4205. - 4205.]

4205.

(a) (1) There is hereby created within the Office of Planning and Research the Commission on Catastrophic Wildfire Cost and Recovery, to examine issues related to catastrophic wildfires associated with utility infrastructure. The commission shall consist of five members. Three members shall be appointed by the Governor, one member shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and one member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(2) The chair of the commission shall be selected by the members of the commission.

(3) Members appointed to the commission shall have demonstrated academic, business, or governmental expertise in laws, policies, and
 programs applicable to insurance or public and private utilities, and to processes for the allocation of costs and the reduction of damages associated with wildfires in the state.

(b) The commission shall hold at least four public meetings throughout the state for purposes of accepting public and expert testimony on, and for evaluating and making recommendations on, the following matters:

(1) Options for the Legislature and the Governor to consider for enactment that would socialize the costs associated with catastrophic wildfires in an equitable manner.

(2) Options for the Legislature and Governor to consider for enactment that would establish a fund to assist in the payment of costs associated with catastrophic wildfires.

(c) (1) On or before July 1, 2019, the commission, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission and the Insurance Commissioner, shall prepare a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and to the Governor containing its assessment of the issues surrounding catastrophic wildfire costs and damages, and making recommendations for changes to law that would ensure equitable distribution of costs among affected parties.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the requirement for submitting a report imposed by paragraph (1) is inoperative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 7.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Regional Forest and Fire Capacity Program [4208. - 4208.1.]

4208.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply: 

(a) “Department” means the Department of Conservation.

(b) “Eligible coordinating organization” means a local government, tribal government, resource conservation district, joint powers authority, or nongovernmental organization with a history of providing technical assistance and demonstrated capacity to coordinate regional partners across the state.

(c) “Program” means the Regional Forest and Fire Capacity Program.

(d) “Regional entity” means a state conservancy, local government, tribal government, resource
 conservation district, joint powers authority, or nongovernmental organization with a history of implementing related projects, demonstrated capacity to work across regional partners, and ability to serve as fiscal administrators for the program.

(e) “Statewide implementation” means identifying and supporting regional entities in every part of the state that contains or is adjacent to a very high or high fire hazard severity zone identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 225, Sec. 16.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4208.1.

(a) There is hereby established in the department the Regional Forest and Fire Capacity Program to support regional leadership to build local and regional capacity and develop, prioritize, and implement strategies and projects that create fire adapted communities and landscapes by improving ecosystem health, community wildfire preparedness, and fire resilience. For strategies and projects that seek to create fire adapted communities, regional entities shall maximize risk reductions to people and property, especially in the most vulnerable communities.

(b) (1) The department shall, upon an appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes, do both of the following:

(A) (i) Provide block grants to regional entities to develop regional strategies that develop governance structures, identify wildfire risks, foster collaboration, and prioritize and implement projects within the region to achieve the goals of the program.

(ii) Regional priority strategy development shall be in coordination with public landowners and other relevant forest and fire planning efforts in wildfire and forest resiliency planning.

(B) Ensure, to the extent feasible, there are regional entities to cover every part of the state that contains or is adjacent to a very high or high fire hazard severity zone identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201).

(2) Regional entities may implement program activities directly or
 provide subgrants or contracts, and collaborative planning efforts with local entities, including municipal governments, tribal governments, nongovernmental organizations, community organizations, fire safe councils, land trusts, resource conservation districts, joint power authorities, special districts, fire departments, residents, private and public forest landowners and managers, businesses, and others, to assist the regional entity in accomplishing all of the following objectives:

(A) Develop regional priority strategies that develop and support fire adapted communities and landscapes by improving forest health, watershed health, fire risk reduction, or fire resilience needed to achieve local, regional, or statewide public safety, climate resiliency, and ecosystem goals included in the “Agreement for Shared Stewardship of California’s Forest and Rangelands” and “California’s Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan.”

(B) Complete project development and permitting to generate implementation-ready projects that address regional landscape resilience and community fire protection priorities for funding consideration.

(C) Implement forest management demonstration projects that showcase scalable models for management, funding, and achieving and quantifying multiple benefits.

(D) Implement community fire preparedness demonstration projects that create durable risk reduction for structures and critical community infrastructure.

(E) Develop outreach, education, and training as needed to facilitate and build capacity to implement this section.

(F) Collect and assess data and information as needed to identify and
 map communities, infrastructure, forests, and watersheds at risk of, and vulnerable to, wildfire, in collaboration with appropriate state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(c) The department shall, upon an appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes, provide block grants to eligible coordinating organizations under the program to support the statewide implementation of the program through coordination of and technical assistance to regional entities, as well as to support forest health and resilience efforts across regions and throughout the state.

(d) To maximize the benefits of the program, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Facilitate peer-to-peer learning within and between regions to share information, experiences, and resources to
 build regional capacity.

(2) Provide technical assistance to regions to enhance regional capacity and assist in the development and prioritization of projects.

(3) Assist regions in identifying potential funding sources for regional priorities.

(4) Encourage the development of local cost share opportunities.

(5) Publish and update on the department’s internet website the following information related to implementation of the program:

(A) A list of regional entities and eligible coordinating organizations funded by the program.

(B) The outcomes of any block grant provided to a regional entity or eligible coordinating
 organization, including a summary of the benefits, such as the number of people and properties for which wildfire risk has been mitigated, ecosystem health benefits, or other measurements of progress towards state goals for public health and safety, climate resilience, and biodiversity, as applicable.

(C) A description of progress towards ensuring there are regional entities to cover every part of the state that contains or is adjacent to a very high or high fire hazard severity zone identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201).

(e) Until July 1, 2025, the department may authorize advance payments on a grant awarded under this section in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 11019.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 569, Sec. 50.   (AB 156)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Community Wildfire Preparedness and Mitigation [4209. - 4209.5.]

4209.

There is within the Office of the State Fire Marshal a Deputy Director of Community Wildfire Preparedness and Mitigation who shall be responsible for fire preparedness and mitigation missions of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, as provided in Section 4209.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 225, Sec. 17.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4209.1.

The Deputy Director of Community Wildfire Preparedness and Mitigation shall be responsible for all of the following programs and activities:

(a) The Fire Prevention Grants Program (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 4124)).

(b) Defensible space requirements pursuant to Sections 4291 and 4291.1.

(c) The California wildfire mitigation financial assistance program described in Article 16.5 (commencing with Section 8654.2) of Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) The establishment of fire hazard severity zones pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with
 Section 4201) of this code and very high fire hazard severity zones pursuant to Chapter 6.8 (commencing with Section 51175) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(e) The requirements of Section 4290.5.

(f) Consultation with the Office of Energy Infrastructure Safety regarding wildfire mitigation plans, pursuant to Sections 8386, 8386.3, and 8386.5 of the Public Utilities Code.

(g) General plan safety element review pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 65300) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(h) Wildland building code standards pursuant to Section 13108.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) Implementation of the minimum fire safety
 standards adopted pursuant to Section 4290.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 225, Sec. 17.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4209.2.

The Deputy Director of Community Wildfire Preparedness and Mitigation and any subordinate employee shall be primarily assigned to the responsibilities established by this article and shall be the lowest priority employees of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for purposes of fire incident support duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 225, Sec. 17.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4209.3.

(a) The State Fire Marshal shall, on or before January 1, 2023, provide the Legislature with a report identifying known personnel and resource shortfalls in implementing programs and activities overseen by the Deputy Director of Community Wildfire Preparedness and Mitigation pursuant to this article.

(b) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section shall be repealed on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 225, Sec. 17.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4209.4.

(a) The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall establish the State Fire Marshal’s Wildfire Mitigation Advisory Committee to provide a public forum to solicit and consider public input on programs and activities pursuant to this article and to advise the Deputy Director of Community Wildfire Preparedness and Mitigation in developing and implementing programs and activities pursuant to this article.

(b) The committee shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide a consistent and regular means of communication on topics related to community wildfire preparedness and fire mitigation between the department, the Office of the State Fire Marshal, representatives of relevant industries,
 state agencies, fire service agencies, and other stakeholders.

(2) Provide a forum for addressing wildfire preparedness and mitigation issues of statewide concern.

(3) Share latest available research and best practices with regard to community fire preparedness and mitigation efforts.

 (4) Seek and provide comments and specific input on proposed programs, policies, guidelines, budget, and technical issues, and inform local agencies and the public of applicable new laws and regulations.

(5) Provide and receive updates and feedback regarding the programs operated by the Office of the State Fire Marshal pursuant to this article.

(c) Members of the committee shall be all of the following:

(1) The director of the department, or their designee.

(2) The director of the Department of Conservation, or their designee.

(3) The Director of the Office of Energy Infrastructure Safety, or their designee.

(4) The chair of the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection, or their designee.

(5) The State Fire Marshal, or their designee.

(6) The Director of Emergency Services, or their designee.

(7) The Insurance Commissioner, or their designee.

(8) The Director of State Planning and Research, or
 their designee.

(9) A representative from the California Fire Safe Council.

(10) A representative from the insurance industry or an insurance research organization.

(11) A local fire service representative.

(12) A representative from the building industry.

(13) A representative from the University of California Cooperative Extension.

(14) A representative from the California Fire Science Consortium.

(15) Any other appropriate stakeholders, including representatives from local governmental agencies, as decided by the State Fire Marshal.

(d) The committee shall meet monthly.

(e) The members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but each member shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(f) The chairperson of the committee shall be the State Fire Marshal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 225, Sec. 17.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4209.5.

(a) The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall establish the Community Wildfire Mitigation Assistance Program to coordinate regional and local efforts with state policies, strategies, and programs for community wildfire mitigation in order to improve wildfire preparedness and prevention, with an emphasis on the most vulnerable communities.

(b) The program shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide technical assistance to local jurisdictions with community wildfire preparedness and prevention services and identify funding opportunities and best practices, including, but not necessarily limited to, defensible space, structure hardening, fuel reduction around communities, wildland
 building code standards, and land use planning.

(2) Identify both of the following:

(A) Programs administered by state, regional, and local agencies to address and minimize the risks of wildfire and coordinate the implementation of those programs.

(B) Public and private programs that may be leveraged to facilitate defensible space, home hardening, and community fuel reduction to minimize the impacts of wildfire to habitable structures.

(3) Conduct outreach efforts to regional and local wildfire mitigation groups, including assessing compliance, educating and informing regional and local agencies, stakeholders, and the public of applicable new laws and regulations. 

(4) Provide technical
 consultation with the development of city and county safety elements.

(5) Develop guidance and decision-support tools useful for data visualization, planning, and analysis.

(6) Establish a statewide clearinghouse for use by state, regional, and local entities to provide a centralized source of data, information, research articles, studies, white papers, reports, best practices, model ordinances, demonstration projects, tools, and other resources related to community wildfire preparedness, mitigation, and risk reduction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 225, Sec. 17.   (AB 9)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. State Responsibility Area Fire Prevention Fees [4210. - 4229.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4210. - 4214.]

4210.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Fire protection of the public trust resources on lands in the state responsibility areas remains a vital interest to California. Lands that are covered in whole or in part by a diverse plant community prevent excessive erosion, retard runoff, reduce sedimentation, and accelerate water percolation to assist in the maintenance of critical sources of water for environmental, irrigation, domestic, or industrial uses.

(b) The presence of structures within state responsibility areas can pose an increased risk of fire ignition and an increased potential for fire damage within the state’s wildlands and
 watersheds. The presence of structures within state responsibility areas can also impair wild land firefighting techniques and could result in greater damage to state lands caused by wildfires.

(c) The costs of fire prevention activities aimed at reducing the effects of structures in state responsibility areas should be borne by the owners of these structures.

(d) Individual owners of structures within state responsibility areas receive a disproportionately larger benefit from fire prevention activities than that realized by the state’s citizens generally.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the economic burden of fire prevention activities that are associated with structures in state responsibility areas shall be equitably distributed among the citizens of the state who generally benefit from those
 activities and those owners of structures in the state responsibility areas who receive a specific benefit other than that general benefit.

(f) It is necessary to impose a fire prevention fee to pay for fire prevention activities in the state responsibility areas that specifically benefit owners of structures in the state responsibility areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (AB 29 1x)   Effective July 8, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4211.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Habitable Structure” means a building that contains one or more dwelling units or that can be occupied for residential use. Buildings occupied for residential use include single family homes, multidwelling structures, mobile and manufactured homes, and condominiums. Habitable structures do not include commercial, industrial, or incidental buildings such as detached garages, barns, outdoor sanitation facilities, and sheds.

(b) “State responsibility area” means state responsibility area as defined in Section 4102.

(c) “Person” means an individual, trust, joint stock company, business concern, or corporation, including, but not limited to, a government corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or association. “Person” also includes any city, county, city and county, district, commission, the state or any department, agency, or political subdivision thereof, any interstate body, and the United States and its agencies and instrumentalities to the extent permitted by law.

(d) “Owner of a habitable structure” means the person that is the owner of record of a habitable structure in the county tax assessor rolls or as recorded in the records of the Department of Housing and Community Development on July 1 of the state fiscal year for which the fee is due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 895, Sec. 1.   (AB 2048)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4212.

(a) (1) By September 1, 2011, the board shall adopt emergency regulations to establish a fire prevention fee for the purposes of this chapter in an amount not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) to be charged on each habitable structure on a parcel that is within a state responsibility area.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that a fire prevention fee of not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) is a reasonable amount for the necessary fire prevention activities of the state that benefit the owner of a habitable structure within a state responsibility area.

(b) On July 1, 2013, and
 annually thereafter, the board may adjust the fire prevention fees imposed pursuant to this chapter to reflect the percentage of change in the average annual value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as calculated by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period in the third quarter of the prior calendar year, as reported by the Department of Finance.

(c) Emergency regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be adopted in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
 health, and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 895, Sec. 2.   (AB 2048)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4213.

(a) (1) Commencing with the 2011–12 fiscal year, the fire prevention fee imposed pursuant to Section 4212 shall be collected annually by the State Board of Equalization in accordance with the Fee Collection Procedures Law (Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code).

(2) Notwithstanding the appeal provisions in the Fee Collection Procedures Law, a determination by the department that a person is required to pay a fire prevention fee, or a determination by the department regarding the amount of that fee, is subject to review under Article 2 (commencing with Section 4220) and is not subject to a petition for redetermination by the State Board of Equalization.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding the refund provisions in the Fee Collection Procedures Law, the State Board of Equalization shall not accept any claim for refund that is based on the assertion that a determination by the department improperly or erroneously calculated the amount of the fire prevention fee, or incorrectly determined that the person is subject to that fee, unless that determination has been set aside by the department or a court reviewing the determination of the department.

(B) If it is determined by the department or a reviewing court that a person is entitled to a refund of all or part of the fire prevention fee, the person shall make a claim to the State Board of Equalization pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 55221) of Part 30 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) The annual fire prevention fee shall be due and payable 30 days from the date of assessment by the State Board of Equalization.

(c) 
 On or before each January 1, the department shall annually transmit to the State Board of Equalization the appropriate name and address of each person who is liable for the fire prevention fee and the amount of the fee to be assessed, as authorized by this article, and at the same time the department shall provide to the State Board of Equalization a contact telephone number for the board to be printed on the bill to respond to questions about the fee.

(d) Commencing with the 2012–13 fiscal year, if in any given fiscal year there are sufficient amounts of money in the State Responsibility Area Fire Prevention Fund created pursuant to Section 4214 to finance the costs of
 the programs under subdivision (d) of Section 4214 for that fiscal year, the fee may not be collected that fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 895, Sec. 3.   (AB 2048)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4213.05.

(a) Commencing with the 2017–18 fiscal year, the fire prevention fee imposed pursuant to Section 4212 shall be suspended, effective July 1, 2017. Any moneys held in reserve in the State Responsibility Area Fire Prevention Fund shall be appropriated by the Legislature in a manner consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 4214.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that moneys derived from the auction or sale of allowances pursuant to a market-based compliance mechanism established pursuant to Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code shall be used to replace the moneys that would have otherwise been collected under Section 4212 to continue fire prevention activities.

(c) The amount appropriated in the annual Budget Act pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not be included in determining the amount of annual proceeds of the fund for purposes of the calculations in Section 39719 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2031.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 8.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Inoperative January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4213.1.

(a) (1) The fire prevention fee imposed pursuant to Section 4212 shall be levied upon the owner of a habitable structure identified by the department as located within the state responsibility area, if that person owns the habitable structure on July 1 of the year for which the fee is due.

(2) The department shall notify an owner, upon whom a fire prevention fee is imposed pursuant to Section 4212, through the fee billing process that if the owner sells the habitable structure or structures, the apportionment of the fire prevention fee may be
 negotiated as one of the terms of the sale. However, payment of the total fire prevention fee liability remains the responsibility of the person who owns the habitable structure on July 1 of the year for which the fee is due.

(b) The board may exempt from the fire prevention fee any habitable structure that is subsequently deemed uninhabitable as a result of a natural disaster during the year for which the fee is due, as well as one subsequent year if the habitable structure has not been repaired or rebuilt. The board shall consider granting an exemption only if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The owner of the
 habitable structure certifies that the structure is not habitable as a result of a natural disaster.

(2) The owner of the habitable structure either documents that the habitable structure passed a defensible space inspection conducted by the department or by one of its agents within one year of the date the structure was damaged or destroyed or certifies that clearance as required under Section 4291 was in place at the time that the structure was damaged or destroyed as a result of a natural disaster.

(c) The board shall prepare forms for purposes of the certification requirements in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 104, Sec. 1.   (AB 301)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4213.2.

If an owner of a property with one or more habitable structures subject to the fire prevention fee imposed pursuant to Section 4212 sells the property, the apportionment of the fire prevention fee may be negotiated as one of the terms of the sale. However, payment of the total fire prevention fee liability remains the responsibility of the person who owns the habitable structure on July 1 of the year for which the fee is due.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 104, Sec. 2.   (AB 301)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4214.

(a) Fire prevention fees collected pursuant to this chapter shall be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, as follows:

(1) The State Board of Equalization shall retain moneys necessary for the payment of refunds pursuant to Section 4228 and reimbursement of the State Board of Equalization for expenses incurred in the collection of the fee.

(2) The moneys collected, other than those retained by the State Board of Equalization pursuant to paragraph (1), shall be deposited into the State Responsibility Area Fire Prevention Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury, and shall be available to the board and
 the department to expend for fire prevention activities specified in subdivision (d) that benefit the owners of habitable structures within a state responsibility area who are required to pay the fire prevention fee. The amount expended to benefit the owners of habitable structures within a state responsibility area shall be commensurate with the amount collected from the owners within that state responsibility area. All moneys in excess of the costs of administration of the board and the department shall be expended only for fire prevention activities in counties with state responsibility areas.

(b) (1) The fund may also be used to cover the costs of administering this chapter.

(2) The fund shall cover all startup costs incurred over a period not to exceed
 two years.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the moneys in this fund be fully appropriated to the board and the department each year in order to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(d) Moneys in the fund shall be used only for the following fire prevention activities, which shall benefit owners of habitable structures within the state responsibility areas who are required to pay the annual fire prevention fee pursuant to this chapter:

(1) Local assistance grants pursuant to subdivision (e).

(2) Grants to Fire Safe Councils, the California Conservation Corps, or certified local conservation corps for fire prevention projects and activities in the
 state responsibility areas.

(3) Grants to a qualified nonprofit organization with a demonstrated ability to satisfactorily plan, implement, and complete a fire prevention project applicable to the state responsibility areas. The department may establish other qualifying criteria.

(4) Inspections by the department for compliance with defensible space requirements around habitable structures in state responsibility areas as required by Section 4291.

(5) Public education to reduce fire risk in the state responsibility areas.

(6) Fire severity and fire hazard mapping by the department in the state responsibility areas.

(7) Other fire prevention projects in the state responsibility areas, authorized by the board.

(e) (1) The board shall establish a local assistance grant program for fire prevention activities designed to benefit habitable structures within state responsibility areas, including public education, that are provided by counties and other local agencies, including special districts, with state responsibility areas within their jurisdictions.

(2) In order to ensure an equitable distribution of funds, the amount of each grant shall be based on the number of habitable structures in state responsibility areas for which the applicant is legally responsible and the amount of moneys made available in the annual Budget Act for this local assistance grant program.

(f) By January 31, 2015, and annually thereafter, the board shall submit to the Legislature a written report on the status and uses of the fund pursuant to this chapter. The written report shall also include an evaluation of the benefits received by counties based on the number of habitable structures in state responsibility areas within their jurisdictions, the effectiveness of the board’s grant programs, the number of defensible space inspections in the reporting period, the degree of compliance with defensible space requirements, measures to increase compliance, if any, and any recommendations to the Legislature.

(g) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (f) is inoperative on January 31, 2017, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of
 the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (f) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(h) It is essential that this article be implemented without delay. To permit timely implementation, the department may contract for services related to the establishment of the fire prevention fee collection process. For this purpose only, and for a period not to exceed 24 months, the provisions of the Public Contract Code or any other provision of law related to public contracting shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 895, Sec. 5.   (AB 2048)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Appeals Process [4220. - 4228.]

4220.

A person from whom the fire prevention fee is determined to be due under this chapter may petition for a redetermination of whether this chapter applies to that person within 30 days after service upon him or her of a notice of the determination. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the 30-day period, the amount determined to be due becomes final at the expiration of the 30-day period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   (AB 29 1x)   Effective July 8, 2011.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4220.1.

If a petition for redetermination is filed after the expiration of the time period specified in Section 4220, the untimely petition may be treated as an administrative protest or claim for refund if the department determines that the facts presented indicate that the fire prevention fee originally determined may have been excessive or that the amount or the application of the fee may have been the result of an error by the department, its agent, or the State Board of Equalization. Petitions filed pursuant to this section shall generally be reviewed in the same manner as a timely petition for redetermination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 895, Sec. 6.   (AB 2048)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 4229.)
-------------------------------------------

4221.
